California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 Services, as necessary to the performance of their duties to inspect, license, and investigate health facilities and community care facilities and to ensure that the standards of care and services provided in such facilities are adequate and appropriate and to ascertain compliance with the rules and regulations to which the facility is subject. The confidential information shall remain confidential except for purposes of inspection, licensing, or investigation pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding in relation thereto. The confidential information may be used by the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding. The confidential information shall be available only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case. Names which are confidential shall be listed
 in attachments separate to the general pleadings. The confidential information shall be sealed after the conclusion of the criminal, civil, or administrative hearings, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision. If the confidential information does not result in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, it shall be sealed after the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services decides that no further action will be taken in the matter of suspected licensing violations. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, confidential information in the possession of the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services shall not contain the name of the patient.

(b) To any board which licenses and certifies professionals in the fields of mental health pursuant to state law, when the Director of State Hospitals has reasonable cause to believe that
 there has occurred a violation of any provision of law subject to the jurisdiction of that board and the records are relevant to the violation. The information shall be sealed after a decision is reached in the matter of the suspected violation, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision. Confidential information in the possession of the board shall not contain the name of the patient.

(c) To a protection and advocacy agency established pursuant to Section 4901, to the extent that the information is incorporated within any of the following:

(1) An unredacted facility evaluation report form or an unredacted complaint investigation report form of the State Department of Social Services. The information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 4903.

(2) An unredacted citation report, unredacted licensing report, unredacted survey report, unredacted plan of correction, or unredacted statement of deficiency of the State Department of Public Health, prepared by authorized licensing personnel or authorized representatives as described in subdivision (a). The information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 4903.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 582.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.2.

Notwithstanding Section 5328, movement and identification information and records regarding a patient who is committed to the department, state hospital, or any other public or private mental health facility approved by the county behavioral health director for observation or for an indeterminate period as a mentally disordered sex offender, or for a person who is civilly committed as a sexually violent predator pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6, or regarding a patient who is committed to the department, to a state hospital, or any other public or private mental health facility approved by the county behavioral health director under Section 1026 or 1370 of the Penal Code or receiving treatment pursuant to Section
 5300 of this code, shall be forwarded immediately without prior request to the Department of Justice. Except as otherwise provided by law, information automatically reported under this section shall be restricted to name, address, fingerprints, date of admission, date of discharge, date of escape or return from escape, date of any home leave, parole or leave of absence and, if known, the county in which the person will reside upon release. The Department of Justice may in turn furnish information reported under this section pursuant to Section 11105 or 11105.1 of the Penal Code. It shall be a misdemeanor for recipients furnished with this information to in turn furnish the information to any person or agency other than those specified in Section 11105 or 11105.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 28.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.3.

(a) When a voluntary patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of Section 5150 of this part and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to the patient’s disappearance from, without prior notice to, a designated facility and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance may be made to relatives and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee. 

(b) (1) When an involuntary patient is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008, and the patient has disappeared from a designated facility, or is transferred between state hospitals, notice of the disappearance or transfer shall be made to the court initially ordering the patient’s commitment pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code, the district attorney for the county that ordered the commitment, and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee. This notice shall be made within 24 hours of the patient’s disappearance or transfer from the facility.

(2) A designated facility shall not permit the release of an involuntary patient who is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph
 (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008, without prior written authorization of the court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 5358. The court may approve the pending release without a hearing unless a party notified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5358 objects to the pending release within 10 days after receiving notice. This paragraph does not apply to the transfer of persons between state hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.4.

The physician in charge of the patient, or the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee, when he or she has probable cause to believe that a patient while hospitalized has committed, or has been the victim of, murder, manslaughter, mayhem, aggravated mayhem, kidnapping, carjacking, robbery, assault with intent to commit a felony, arson, extortion, rape, forcible sodomy,
 forcible oral copulation, unlawful possession of a weapon as provided in any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code, or escape from a hospital by a mentally disordered sex offender as provided in Section 6330 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall release information about the patient to governmental law enforcement agencies.

The physician in charge of the patient, or the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee, when he or she has probable cause to believe that a patient, while hospitalized has committed, or has been the victim of assault or battery may release information about the patient to governmental law enforcement agencies.

This section shall be limited solely to information directly relating to the factual circumstances of the commission of the enumerated offenses and shall not include any information relating to the mental state of the patient or the circumstances of
 his or her voluntary or involuntary admission, commitment, or treatment.

This section shall not be construed as an exception to or in any other way affecting the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 101.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.5.

Information and records described in Section 5328 may be disclosed in communications relating to the prevention, investigation, or treatment of elder abuse or dependent adult abuse pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750), of Part 3 of Division 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1166, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.6.

When any disclosure of information or records is made as authorized by the provisions of Section 11878 or 11879 of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 5328, Sections 5328.1, 5328.3, or 5328.4, the physician in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility shall promptly cause to be entered into the patient’s medical record: the date and circumstances under which such disclosure was made; the names and relationships to the patient if any, of persons or agencies to whom such disclosure was made; and the specific information disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 333.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.7.

Signed consent forms by a patient for release of any information to which such patient is required to consent under the provisions of Sections 11878 or 11879 of the Health and Safety Code or subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 5328 shall be obtained for each separate use with the use specified, the information to be released, the name of the agency or individual to whom information will be released indicated on the form and the name of the responsible individual who has authorization to release information specified. Any use of this form shall be noted in the patient file. Patients who sign consent forms shall be given a copy of the consent form
 signed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 334.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.8.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals, the physician in charge of the patient, or the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee, shall release the patient’s medical record to a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner, upon request, when a patient dies from any cause, natural or otherwise, while hospitalized in a state mental hospital. Except for the purposes included in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner shall not disclose any information
 contained in the medical record obtained pursuant to this subdivision without a court order or authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.11 of the Civil Code.

(b) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, a health or behavioral health facility or clinic, and the physician in charge of the patient shall release the patient’s medical record to a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner, upon request, when a patient dies from any cause, natural or otherwise. Except for the purposes included in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.10 of the Civil
 Code, a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner shall not disclose any information contained in the medical record obtained pursuant to this subdivision without a court order or authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.11 of the Civil Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, a reference to a “medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner” means a coroner or deputy coroner, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.35 of the Penal Code, or a licensed physician who currently performs official autopsies on behalf of a county coroner’s office or a medical examiner’s office, whether as a government employee or under contract to that office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.9.

If at such time as a patient’s hospital records are required by an employer to whom the patient has applied for employment, such records shall be forwarded to a qualified physician or psychiatrist representing the employer upon the request of the patient unless the physician or administrative officer responsible for the patient deems the release of such records contrary to the best interest of the patient.

If the physician or administrative officer responsible for a patient deems the release of such records contrary to the best interest of the patient, he shall notify the patient within five days. In the event that the disclosure of
 the patient’s records to the patient himself would not serve his best interests, the physician or administrative officer in question shall render formal notice of his decision to the superior court of the county in which the patient resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1058.)
-------------------------------------------

5329.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards set by the Director of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 64.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5330.

(a) Any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully and knowingly released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of this chapter, or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11860) of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(2) Three times the amount of actual damages, if
 any, sustained by the plaintiff.

(b) Any person may bring an action against an individual who has negligently released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of this chapter, or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11860) of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for both of the following:

(1) One thousand dollars ($1,000). In order to recover under this paragraph, it shall not be a prerequisite that the plaintiff suffer or be threatened with actual damages.

(2) The amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff.

(c) Any person may, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, bring an action to enjoin the release of
 confidential information or records in violation of this chapter, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this section.

(d) In addition to the amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), the plaintiff shall recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5331.

No person may be presumed to be incompetent because he or she has been evaluated or treated for mental disorder or chronic alcoholism, regardless of whether such evaluation or treatment was voluntarily or involuntarily received. Any person who leaves a public or private mental health facility following evaluation or treatment for mental disorder or chronic alcoholism, regardless of whether that evaluation or treatment was
 voluntarily or involuntarily received, shall be given a statement of California law as stated in this paragraph.

Any person who has been, or is, discharged from a state hospital and received voluntary or involuntary treatment under former provisions of this code relating to inebriates or the mentally ill shall, upon request to the state hospital executive director or the State Department of State Hospitals, be given a statement of California law as stated in this section unless the person is found to be incompetent under proceedings for conservatorship or guardianship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 128.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5332.

(a) Antipsychotic medication, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 5008, may be administered to any person subject to detention pursuant to Section 5150, 5250, 5260, 5270.15, or 5270.70, if that person does not refuse that medication following disclosure of the right to refuse medication as well as information required to be given to persons pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5152 and subdivision (b) of Section 5213.

(b) If any person subject to detention pursuant to Section 5150, 5250, 5260, 5270.15, or 5270.70, and for whom antipsychotic medication has been prescribed, orally refuses or gives other indication of refusal of treatment
 with that medication, the medication shall be administered only when treatment staff have considered and determined that treatment alternatives to involuntary medication are unlikely to meet the needs of the patient, and upon a determination of that person’s incapacity to refuse the treatment, in a hearing held for that purpose.

(c) Each hospital in conjunction with the hospital medical staff or any other treatment facility in conjunction with its clinical staff shall develop internal procedures for facilitating the filing of petitions for capacity hearings and other activities required pursuant to this chapter.

(d) When a person is subject to detention pursuant to Section 5150, 5250, 5260, 5270.15, or 5270.70, the agency or facility providing the treatment shall acquire the
 person’s medication history, if possible.

(e) In the case of an emergency, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 5008, a person detained pursuant to Section 5150, 5250, 5260, 5270.15, or 5270.70 may be treated with antipsychotic medication over the person’s objection prior to a capacity hearing, but only with antipsychotic medication that is required to treat the emergency condition, which shall be provided in the manner least restrictive to the personal liberty of the patient. It is not necessary for harm to take place or become unavoidable prior to intervention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   (SB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5333.

(a) Persons subject to capacity hearings pursuant to Section 5332 shall have a right to representation by an advocate or legal counsel. “Advocate,” as used in this section, means a person who is providing mandated patients’ rights advocacy services pursuant to Chapter 6.2 (commencing with Section 5500), and this chapter. If the State Department of State Hospitals provides training to patients’ rights
 advocates, that training shall include issues specific to capacity hearings.

(b) Petitions for capacity hearings pursuant to Section 5332 shall be filed with the superior court. The director of the treatment facility or his or her designee shall personally deliver a copy of the notice of the filing of the petition for a capacity hearing to the person who is the subject of the petition.

(c) The mental health professional delivering the copy of the notice of the filing of the petition to the court for a capacity hearing shall, at the time of delivery, inform the person of his or her legal right to a capacity hearing, including the right to the assistance of the patients’ rights advocate or an attorney to prepare for the hearing and to answer any questions or concerns.

(d) As soon after the filing of the petition for a
 capacity hearing is practicable, an attorney or a patients’ rights advocate shall meet with the person to discuss the capacity hearing process and to assist the person in preparing for the capacity hearing and to answer questions or to otherwise assist the person, as is appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 129.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5334.

(a) (1) Capacity hearings required by Section 5332 shall be heard within 24 hours of the filing of the petition whenever possible. However, if any party needs additional time to prepare for the hearing, the hearing shall be postponed for 24 hours. In case of hardship, hearings may also be postponed for an additional 24 hours, pursuant to local policy developed by the county mental health director and the presiding judge of the superior court regarding the scheduling of hearings. The policy developed pursuant to this subdivision shall specify procedures for the prompt filing and processing of petitions to ensure that the deadlines set forth in this section are met, and shall take into
 consideration the availability of advocates and the treatment needs of the patient. In no event shall hearings be held beyond 72 hours of the filing of the petition. The person who is the subject of the petition and the person’s advocate or counsel shall receive a copy of the petition at the time it is filed.

(2) (A) Under exigent circumstances, upon the filing of a petition for a hearing to determine a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication and an attestation of exigent circumstances being documented in a person’s medical record pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5336, a hearing shall be held to determine the person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication on an expedited basis and as soon as reasonably practicable.

(B) This paragraph shall be inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(b) (1) Capacity hearings shall be held in an appropriate location at the facility where the person is receiving treatment, and shall be held in a manner compatible with, and the least disruptive of, the treatment being provided to the person.

(2) Subject to any applicable rules of court, a capacity hearing may be conducted by remote means in an appropriate location at the facility where the person is receiving treatment as authorized pursuant to Section 367.76 of the Code of Civil Procedure, so long as the hearing would be compatible with, and be the least disruptive of, the treatment being provided to the person, as required by paragraph (1).

(c) Capacity hearings shall be conducted by a superior court judge, a court-appointed commissioner or referee, or a court-appointed hearing officer. All commissioners, referees, and hearing officers shall be appointed by the superior court from a list of attorneys unanimously approved by a panel composed of the local mental health director, the county public defender, and the county counsel or district attorney designated by the county board of supervisors. No employee of the county mental health program or of any facility designated by the county and approved by the department as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation may serve as a hearing officer. All hearing officers shall receive training in the issues specific to capacity hearings.

(d) The person who is the subject of the capacity hearing shall be given oral
 notification of the determination at the conclusion of the capacity hearing. As soon thereafter as is practicable, the person, the person’s counsel or advocate, and the director of the facility where the person is receiving treatment shall be provided with written notification of the capacity determination, which shall include a statement of the evidence relied upon and the reasons for the determination. A copy of the determination shall be submitted to the superior court.

(e) (1) The person who is the subject of the capacity hearing may appeal the determination to the superior court or the court of appeal.

(2) The person who filed the original petition for a capacity hearing may request the district attorney or county counsel in the county where the
 person is receiving treatment to appeal the determination to the superior court or the court of appeal, on behalf of the state.

(3) Nothing shall prohibit treatment from being initiated pending appeal of a determination of incapacity pursuant to this section.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the right of a person to bring a writ of habeas corpus pursuant to Section 5275, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(f) All appeals to the superior court pursuant to this section shall be subject to de novo review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 643, Sec. 3.   (SB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5336.

(a) (1) A determination that a person does not have the capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication made pursuant to Section 5334 during the detention period described in Section 5150 or 5250 shall remain in effect for the duration of the detention period described in Section 5150, and for the duration of the detention period described in Section 5250, or for the duration of both periods together.

(2) Unless otherwise specified, and except as applied to Sections 5150 and 5250, a treating physician may request a hearing for a new determination of a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic
 medication, to be made pursuant to Section 5334, at any time in the 48 hours prior to the end of the duration of the current detention period when it reasonably appears to the treating physician that it is necessary for the person to be detained for a subsequent detention period and the person’s capacity has not been restored according to standards developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5332.

(3) A determination that a person does not have the capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication pursuant to this section remains in effect until one of the following occurs, whichever occurs first in time:

(A) In the judgment of the person’s treating physician, the person’s capacity has been restored or the person no longer meets the criteria for involuntary
 detention, according to standards developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5332.

(B) The court or hearing officer determines that the person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication is restored.

(C) The time limit for the detention period described in Section 5150, Section 5250, or for the detention period of both periods together, expires.

(b) (1) Under exigent circumstances, an order for treatment with antipsychotic medication made pursuant to Section 5332 shall remain in effect at the beginning of a detention period described in Section 5260, 5270.15, or 5270.70, provided that a petition for a new determination on the question of capacity has been filed pursuant to
 Section 5334, and shall remain in effect until a hearing on that petition for that detention period is held under the exigent circumstances described by this subdivision and a decision is issued as set forth in Section 5334.

(2) Upon receipt of a petition for a hearing to determine a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication and attestation of exigent circumstances being documented in the person’s medical record pursuant to this subdivision, a hearing shall be held on an expedited basis to determine the person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication as soon as reasonably practicable and within 24 hours.

(3) In any case where an attestation of exigent circumstances is documented in the person’s medical record pursuant to this subdivision
 and an order for treatment with antipsychotic medication made pursuant to Section 5332 remains in effect, the facility where the person is receiving treatment shall report all of the following to the county behavioral health director in the county in which they operate, in a form and manner and in accordance with timelines prescribed by the county behavioral health director:

(A) The date and time when the physician or facility originally
 filed a petition with the superior court to request a hearing to determine a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication under this section.

(B) The date when the applicable detention period described in paragraph (1) was scheduled to expire prior to the attestation described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6) being documented in the person’s medical record.

(C) The date and time when the attestation of exigent circumstances was documented in the
 person’s medical record, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6).

(D) The reason for the delay of the originally requested capacity hearing, if known, including, but not limited to, the lack of timely scheduling of the hearing, the unavailability of a hearing officer, the unavailability of an attorney or patients’ rights advocate to represent the person subject to the petition, court closure, the unavailability of remote hearing technology,
 the unavailability of the person subject to the petition, or the unavailability of facility staff to present the reasons for the petition.

(E) The date and time when the capacity hearing was held on an expedited basis.

(4) (A) County behavioral health directors shall provide the information specified in paragraph (3) to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) Each May 1, beginning May 1, 2026, the State Department of Health Care Services shall compile the information it receives from county behavioral health directors pursuant to this paragraph during the prior calendar year, as well as information about the county where the facility that submitted the information is located, and report the information pursuant to the requirements of Section 5402.

(5) This subdivision does not apply to a person whose capacity has been restored according to standards developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5332 or affect the requirement that a hearing be conducted to determine a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication within the applicable time limits specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5334, other than to require that such a hearing is held on an expedited basis.

(6) In order for there to be exigent circumstances necessitating an expedited hearing pursuant to this subdivision, all of the following must be true:

(A) A petition for a new determination on the question of capacity pursuant to Section 5334 has been filed prior to the expiration of the current order and in a period of time
 that provides a reasonable opportunity for a hearing to be held prior to the expiration of the current order and at least eight hours prior to the order’s expiration.

(B) There has been a delay in a hearing to determine a person’s capacity to refuse treatment with antipsychotic medication made pursuant to Section 5334, creating a risk that the existing capacity determination may expire before a new capacity determination is made.

(C) The person’s treating physician documents in a written attestation of exigent circumstances, which shall be maintained in the person’s medical record, that one of the following would likely occur if there were a lapse in the person’s treatment with antipsychotic medication:

(i) An emergency, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 5008.

(ii) A serious deterioration or decompensation of the person’s mental health condition that could result in significant harm to the person based upon the facts of the person’s individual circumstances, which the treating physician documents in their written attestation of exigent circumstances.

(D) The extension of treatment with antipsychotic medication until a new capacity hearing is held on the basis of an attestation of exigent circumstances described in this subdivision shall be invoked for a person only one time during the applicable detention period covered by the existing capacity determination.

(7) This subdivision shall be inoperative on January
 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 643, Sec. 4.   (SB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5337.

Notwithstanding Section 5257, nothing shall prohibit the filing of a petition for post certification pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) for persons who have been determined to be a danger to others at a certification review hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 681, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Community Controlled Substances Treatment Services [5340. - 5344.]

5340.

It is the intention of the Legislature by enacting this article to provide legal procedures for the custody, evaluation, and treatment of users of controlled substances. The enactment of this article shall not be construed to be evidence that a person subject to its provisions is has a mental health disorder, or evidence that the Legislature considers that those persons have a mental health disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 93.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5341.

As used in this article, “controlled substances” means those substances referred to in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

5342.

Where other applicable sections of this part contain the phrase “a danger to himself or herself or others, or gravely disabled,” such sections shall be deemed to refer to the condition of danger to self or others or grave disability as a result of the use of controlled substances, rather than by mental disorder, as such.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

5343.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any person is a danger to others or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled, as a result of the use of controlled substances, he or she shall be subject, insofar as possible, to the provisions of Articles 1 (commencing with Section 5150), 2 (commencing with Section 5200), 4 (commencing with Section 5250), 5 (commencing with Section 5275), and 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of this chapter, except that any custody, evaluation and treatment, or any procedure pursuant to such provisions shall only be related to and concerned with the problem of the person’s use of controlled substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

5344.

Any expenditure for the custody, evaluation, treatment, or other procedures for services rendered a person pursuant to this article shall be considered an expenditure made under the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of this division, and shall be paid as are other expenditures pursuant to that part. No person shall be admitted to a state hospital for care and treatment of his or her use of controlled substances prior to screening and referral by an agency designated in the county Short-Doyle plan to provide the services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. The Assisted Outpatient Treatment Demonstration Project Act of 2002 [5345. - 5349.1.]

5345.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as Laura’s Law.

(b) “Assisted outpatient treatment” shall be defined as categories of outpatient services that have been ordered by a court pursuant to Section 5346 or 5347.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1017, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5346.

(a) In any county or group of counties where services are available as provided in Section 5348, a court may order a person who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to this section to obtain assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the facts stated in the verified petition filed in accordance with this section are true and establish that all of the requisite criteria set forth in this section are met, including, but not limited to, each of the following:

(1) The person is 18 years of age or older.

(2) The person is experiencing a mental illness as defined in paragraphs (2)
 and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3.

(3) There has been a clinical determination that, in view of the person’s treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(A) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person’s condition is substantially deteriorating.

(B) The person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or serious harm to the person or to others, as defined in Section 5150.

(4) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for the person’s mental
 illness, in that at least one of the following is true:

(A) The person’s mental illness has, at least twice within the last 36 months, been a substantial factor in necessitating hospitalization, or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state correctional facility or local correctional facility, not including any period during which the person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

(B) The person’s mental illness has resulted in one or more acts of serious and violent behavior toward themselves or another, or threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to themselves or another within the last 48 months, not including any period in which the person was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding
 the filing of the petition.

(5) The person has been offered an opportunity to participate in a treatment plan by the director of the local mental health department, or the director’s designee, provided the treatment plan includes all of the services described in Section 5348, and the person continues to fail to engage in treatment.

(6) Participation in the assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive placement necessary to ensure the person’s recovery and stability.

(7) It is likely that the person will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(b) (1) A petition for an order authorizing assisted outpatient treatment
 may be filed by the county behavioral health director, or the director’s designee, in the superior court in the county in which the person who is the subject of the petition is present or
 reasonably believed to be present.

(2) A request may be made only by any of the following persons to the county mental health department for the filing of a petition to obtain an order authorizing assisted outpatient treatment:

(A) A person 18 years of age or older with whom the person who is the subject of the petition resides.

(B) A person who is the parent, spouse, or sibling or child 18 years of age or older of the person who is the subject of the petition.

(C) The director of a public or private agency, treatment facility, charitable organization, or licensed residential care facility providing mental health services to the person who is the subject of